Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB465.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 258 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act:
(1) "Animal" means any warm-blooded living creature except a human being;
(2) "Animal shelter" has the same meaning as in KRS 258.095;
(3) "Animal testing facility" means a privately or publicly owned, leased, or operated
partnership, corporation, association, school, institution, or organization in
Kentucky that uses animals for experimentation or research or that tests chemical
substances, ingredients, drugs, medical devices, vaccines, products, or product
formulations on animals; and
(4) "Retired dog or cat" means a dog or cat:
(a) Confined at an animal testing facility;
(b) No longer required for testing, experimentation, or research purposes; and
(c) Determined by the animal testing facility's attending veterinarian to be
suitable for adoption.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 258 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An animal testing facility, unless euthanizing the retired dog or cat is required for
health or safety reasons:
(a) Shall offer a retired dog or cat to an animal shelter to facilitate the transfer
of ownership and custody of the retired dog or cat to a person for placement
into the person's permanent home; or
(b) Shall transfer ownership and custody of the retired dog or cat to a person
for permanent placement in the person's home according to an
arrangement agreed upon by the animal testing facility and the person
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 12/22/2025 3:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1203
adopting the retired dog or cat.
(2) In order to effectuate subsection (1) of this section, an animal testing facility:
(a) Shall keep an offer to transfer ownership and custody of a retired dog or cat
to an animal shelter or person for private placement open for a minimum of
thirty (30) days;
(b) May enter into a collaborative agreement with one (1) or more animal
shelters for the purpose of carrying out the requirements of this section;
and
(c) Shall be immune from civil liability for acts carried out in good faith that
are related to or result from the transfer of a retired dog or cat.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 258 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An animal testing facility:
(a) Shall not use state funds to perform research or testing on animals that
results in pain and distress that is classified as Category D or E by the
United States Department of Agriculture under the federal Animal Welfare
Act, 7 U.S.C. sec. 2131 et seq., and 9 C.F.R. sec. 230 et seq., as amended;
and
(b) May use state funds for:
1. The construction or maintenance of a research facility;
2. The purchase or maintenance of general-use equipment;
3. Overhead costs;
4. Capital improvements;
5. Faculty or employee salaries;
6. Administering a form of recognized veterinary treatment, including
services such as spaying and neutering, the purposes of which are to
improve the health, welfare, or safety of the animal; or
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 12/22/2025 3:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1203
7. Research on a dog or cat with a naturally occurring disease or injury
that is conducted:
a. For the benefit of the animal; and
b. With the intention of studying the effect of a procedure, device,
or treatment protocol.
(2) On or before January 31, 2027, and each January 31 thereafter, each animal
testing facility that receives state funds shall post on its publicly accessible
internet website a written report for the preceding calendar year. The report shall
be posted in a conspicuous and easily accessible manner so that the public can
access a copy of the report electronically. The written report shall include the
following:
(a) The total number of animals, by species, that were held or used for research
or testing by the animal facility;
(b) A list of active animal research or testing projects, including project titles,
the stated purpose of each project, the species, and number of animals used
by each project;
(c) The total amount of funding spent on animal research or testing projects,
including federal, state, private, and other funding;
(d) A description of any programs used to transfer the ownership and custody
of retired dogs or cats following the end of their use in research, including
the total number of retired dogs or cats, by breed, released for adoption; and
(e) A detailed explanation of specific efforts by the institution to refine, reduce,
and replace the use of animals in research and testing during the preceding
calendar year.
(3) This section shall not apply to research or testing on livestock or poultry as
defined in KRS 246.010.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 12/22/2025 3:28 PM Jacketed